Wisconsin, session 2025, AB513.
do enact as follows:AB513,11Section 1. 111.39 (4) (d) of the statutes is amended to read:AB513,3,52111.39 (4) (d) The department shall serve a certified copy of the findings and 3order on the respondent, the order to have the same force as other orders of the 4department and be enforced as provided in s. 103.005. The department shall also 5serve a certified copy of the findings and order on the complainant, together with a 6notice advising the complainant about the right to seek, and the time for seeking, 7review by the commission under sub. (5); about the right to bring, and the time for 8bringing, an action for judicial review under s. 111.395; and about the right to 9bring, and the time for bringing, an action under s. 111.397 (1) (a). Any person 10aggrieved by noncompliance with the order may have the order enforced specifically 1by suit in equity. If the examiner finds that the respondent has not engaged in 2discrimination, unfair honesty testing, or unfair genetic testing as alleged in the 3complaint, the department shall serve a certified copy of the examiner’s findings 4served on the complainant, together with shall be accompanied by an order 5dismissing the complaint.AB513,26Section 2. 111.39 (5) (b) of the statutes is amended to read:AB513,3,187111.39 (5) (b) If no petition is filed the respondent or complainant does not file 8a petition under par. (a) within 21 days from the date that a copy of the findings and 9order of the examiner is mailed to the last-known address of the respondent served 10on that party, the findings and order shall be considered final for purposes of 11enforcement under sub. (4) (d). If a timely petition is filed, the commission, on 12review, may either affirm, reverse, or modify the findings or order in whole or in 13part, or set aside the findings and order and remand to the department for further 14proceedings. Such actions shall be based on a review of the evidence submitted. If 15the commission is satisfied that a respondent or complainant has been prejudiced 16because of exceptional delay in the receipt of a copy of any findings and order it, the 17commission may extend the time another 21 days for filing the petition with the 18department.AB513,319Section 3. 111.39 (5) (d) of the statutes is created to read:AB513,4,220111.39 (5) (d) The commission shall serve a certified copy of the commission’s 21decision on the respondent. The commission shall also serve a certified copy of the 22commission’s decision on the complainant, together with a notice advising the 23complainant about the right to bring, and the time for bringing, an action for 1judicial review under s. 111.395 and about the right to bring, and the time for 2bringing, an action under s. 111.397 (1) (a).AB513,43Section 4. 111.397 of the statutes is created to read:AB513,4,94111.397 Civil action. (1) (a) Except as provided in this paragraph, the 5department or an individual alleged or found to have been discriminated against or 6subjected to unfair honesty testing or unfair genetic testing may bring an action in 7circuit court requesting the relief described in sub. (2) (a) against an employer, labor 8organization, or employment agency that is alleged or found to have engaged in that 9discrimination, unfair honesty testing, or unfair genetic testing.AB513,4,1310(b) If a petition for judicial review of the findings and order of the commission 11concerning the same violation as the violation giving rise to the action under par. 12(a) is filed, the circuit court shall consolidate the proceeding for judicial review and 13the action under par. (a).AB513,4,1714(c) An individual alleged or found to have been discriminated against or 15subjected to unfair honesty testing or unfair genetic testing is not required to file a 16complaint under s. 111.39 or seek review under s. 111.395 in order for the 17department or the individual to bring an action under par. (a).AB513,4,1918(d) An action under par. (a) shall be commenced within 300 days after the 19alleged discrimination, unfair honesty testing, or unfair genetic testing occurred.AB513,5,1220(2) (a) Subject to pars. (b) and (c), in an action under sub. (1) (a), if the circuit 21court finds that discrimination, unfair honesty testing, or unfair genetic testing has 22occurred, or if such a finding has been made by an examiner or the commission and 23not been further appealed, the circuit court may order any relief that an examiner 1would be empowered to order under s. 111.39 (4) (c) after a hearing on a complaint 2filed under s. 111.39. In addition, the circuit court shall order the defendant to pay 3to the individual discriminated against or subjected to unfair honesty testing or 4unfair genetic testing any other compensatory damages, and punitive damages 5under s. 895.043 that the circuit court or jury finds appropriate, plus reasonable 6costs and attorney fees incurred in the action. If any relief was ordered under s. 7111.39 or 111.395, the circuit court shall specify whether the relief ordered under 8this paragraph is in addition to or replaces the relief ordered under s. 111.39 or 9111.395. The sum of the amount of compensatory damages for future economic 10losses and for pain and suffering, emotional distress, mental anguish, loss of 11enjoyment of life, and other noneconomic losses and the amount of punitive 12damages that a circuit court may order may not exceed the following:AB513,5,15131. In the case of a defendant that employs 100 or fewer employees for each 14working day in each of 20 or more calendar weeks in the current or preceding year, 15$50,000.AB513,5,18162. In the case of a defendant that employs more than 100 but fewer than 201 17employees for each working day in each of 20 or more calendar weeks in the current 18or preceding year, $100,000.AB513,5,21193. In the case of a defendant that employs more than 200 but fewer than 501 20employees for each working day in each of 20 or more calendar weeks in the current 21or preceding year, $200,000.AB513,6,2224. In the case of a defendant that employs more than 500 employees for each 1working day in each of 20 or more calendar weeks in the current or preceding year, 2$300,000.AB513,6,53(b) If the circuit court orders a payment under par. (a) because of a violation of 4s. 111.321, 111.37, or 111.372 by an individual employed by an employer, the 5employer of that individual is liable for the payment.AB513,6,86(c) 1. In this paragraph, “consumer price index” means the average of the 7consumer price index for all urban consumers, U.S. city average, as determined by 8the bureau of labor statistics of the federal department of labor.AB513,6,2192. Except as provided in this subdivision, beginning on July 1, 2024, and on 10each July 1 after that, the department shall adjust the amounts specified in par. (a) 111., 2., 3., and 4. by calculating the percentage difference between the consumer price 12index for the 12-month period ending on December 31 of the preceding year and the 13consumer price index for the 12-month period ending on December 31 of the year 14before the preceding year and adjusting those amounts by that percentage 15difference. The department shall publish the adjusted amounts calculated under 16this subdivision in the Wisconsin Administrative Register, and the adjusted 17amounts shall apply to actions commenced under sub. (1) (a) beginning on July 1 of 18the year of publication. This subdivision does not apply if the consumer price index 19for the 12-month period ending on December 31 of the preceding year did not 20increase over the consumer price index for the 12-month period ending on 21December 31 of the year before the preceding year.AB513,522Section 5. 814.04 (intro.) of the statutes is amended to read:AB513,7,423814.04 Items of costs. (intro.) Except as provided in ss. 93.20, 100.195 (5m) 1(b), 100.30 (5m), 106.50 (6) (i) and (6m) (a), 111.397 (2) (a), 115.80 (9), 767.553 (4) 2(d), 769.313, 802.05, 814.245, 895.035 (4), 895.044, 895.443 (3), 895.444 (2), 895.445 3(3), 895.446 (3), 895.506, 943.212 (2) (b), 943.245 (2) (d), 943.51 (2) (b), and 995.10 4(3), when allowed costs shall be as follows:AB513,65Section 6. Initial applicability.AB513,7,86(1) Employment discrimination damages. This act first applies to acts of 7employment discrimination, unfair honesty testing, or unfair genetic testing 8committed on the effective date of this subsection.AB513,7,99